pl: Akcesoria dołączone do ręcznego krosna naręcznego: Pasek / grzebień do dociskania; Futerał / torba do przenoszenia; Zaciski; Szydełko do nicielnicy; Instrukcja obsługi / przewodnik ze wzorami; Pałeczka tkacka; Czółenko; Kołki osnuwnicze; Włóczka; Inne
sv: Tillbehör som medföljer knävävstol: Bälte/vävsked; Bärväska/påse; Klämmor; Solvkrok; Bruksanvisning/mönsterguide; Mönstersticka; Skyttel; Varppinnar; Garn; Övrigt
fr: Accessoires inclus avec le métier à tisser à main: Ceinture/peigne tasseur; Étui/sac de transport; Pinces; Crochet passe-fil; Manuel d’instructions / guide de motifs; Baguette à motif; Navette; Chevilles d’ourdissage; Fil; Autre
ko: 수동식 직기 액세서리 포함: 벨트/비터 콤; 휴대용 케이스/가방; 클램프; 종광 훅; 사용 설명서/패턴 가이드; 픽업 스틱; 셔틀; 워핑 페그; 실; 기타
tr: Diz tipi el dokuma tezgâhı aksesuarları dahil: Kemer / vurma tarağı; Taşıma çantası / torbası; Kelepçeler; Gücü kancası; Kullanım kılavuzu / desen rehberi; Toplama çubuğu; Mekik; Çözgü çubukları; İplik; Diğer
en: Lap hand loom accessories included: Belt / beater comb; Carrying case / bag; Clamps; Heddle hook; Instruction manual / pattern guide; Pick-up stick; Shuttle; Warping pegs; Yarn; Other
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru războiul de țesut manual: Curea / pieptăn pentru bătut; Casetă / geantă de transport; Cleme; Cârlig pentru ițe; Manual de instrucțiuni / ghid de modele; Baghetă de ridicare; Suveică; Cuie de urzit; Fir; Altele
th: รวมอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องทอมือแบบตัก: เข็มขัด / หวีทอผ้า; กล่องพกพา / กระเป๋า; แคลมป์; ตะขอเกี่ยวเส้นด้าย; คู่มือการใช้งาน / คำแนะนำการทอ; ไม้เก็บลาย; กระสวย; หลักเดินด้ายยืน; เส้นด้าย; อื่นๆ
nb: Inkludert tilbehør til håndvev: Belte / vevskje; Bæreveske / bag; Klemmer; Hovelkrok; Instruksjonsbok / mønsterveiledning; Plukkepinne; Skytel; Renningstopper; Garn; Annet
fi: Sylikangaspuiden mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Vyö / pirta; Kantolaukku / pussi; Puristimet; Niisikoukku; Ohjekirja / malliopas; Poimintalasta; Sukkula; Loimitapit; Lanka; Muu
hr-HR: Uključen pribor za ručni tkalački stroj: Remen / češalj tkalačkog stana; Torbica / torba za nošenje; Stezaljke; Kukica za provlačenje niti; Priručnik s uputama / vodič za uzorke; Drvce za skupljanje niti; Čunak; Klinovi za osnovu; Pređa; Ostalo
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für den Handwebrahmen: Gürtel / Webkamm; Tragetasche / Tasche; Klemmen; Litzenhaken; Bedienungsanleitung / Musteranleitung; Lesestab; Schiffchen; Schärstifte; Garn; Sonstige
hu: Mellékelt ölben használható szövőkeret-kiegészítők: Öv / vetélőfésű; Hordtáska / szatyor; Rögzítők; Nyüsthorog; Használati útmutató / mintakönyv; Felszedőpálca; Vetélő; Felvető pálcák; Fonal; Egyéb
es: Accesorios para telar de regazo incluidos: Cinturón/peine de batidor; Estuche/bolso de transporte; Abrazaderas; Gancho de lizos; Manual de instrucciones/guía de patrones; Palo de recogida; Lanzadera; Clavijas de urdimbre; Hilo; Otro
pt-PT: Acessórios para teares de colo incluídos: Cinto/pente de tear; Estojo/saco de transporte; Grampos; Gancho de liço; Manual de instruções/guia de padrões; Régua de separação; Lançadeira; Pinos de urdidura; Fio; Outro
it: Accessori inclusi con il telaio manuale da grembo: Cintura/pettine battitore; Custodia/borsa per il trasporto; Morsetti; Gancio per licci; Manuale di istruzioni/guida ai modelli; Bastoncino passafilo; Navetta; Pioli per orditura; Filato; Altro
lt-LT: Įtraukti stalinio audimo staklių priedai: Diržas / mušimo šukos; Nešiojimo dėklas / krepšys; Spaustukai; Nyčių kabliukas; Instrukcijų vadovas / raštų vadovas; Raštų lazdelė (Pick-up stick); Šaudyklė; Metimo kaiščiai; Verpalai; Kita
ru: Входящие в комплект аксессуары для ручного настольного ткацкого станка: Пояс / бердо; Футляр для переноски / сумка; Струбцины; Проборный крючок; Руководство по эксплуатации / справочник по схемам; Бральница; Челнок; Колышки для снования; Пряжа; Другое
pt-BR: Tear manual de colo acessórios incluídos: Cinto / pente de tear; Estojo / bolsa de transporte; Braçadeiras; Agulha passa-fios; Manual de instruções / guia de padrões; Vareta de separação; Navete; Pinos de urdidura; Fio; Outro
el: Συμπεριλαμβανόμενα αξεσουάρ αργαλειού χειρός: Ζώνη / χτένι (beater); Θήκη μεταφοράς / τσάντα; Σφιγκτήρες; Άγκιστρο μιταριών; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών / οδηγός σχεδίων; Βελόνα pick-up; Σαΐτα; Πασσαλάκια στημονιού; Νήμα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za namizno ročno statve: Pas/glavnik za nabijanje; Nosilni etui/torba; Primeži; Kljukica za nitnice; Priročnik z navodili/vodnik za vzorce; Pobiralna palčka; Čolniček; Zatiči za snovanje; Preja; Drugo
vi: Phụ kiện khung dệt cầm tay đi kèm: Dây đai / lược dệt; Hộp / túi đựng; Kẹp; Móc go; Sổ tay hướng dẫn / sổ tay mẫu; Que gẩy sợi; Thoi dệt; Cọc móc sợi dọc; Sợi len; Khác
nl: Lap hand loom meegeleverde accessoires: Riem / weefkam; Draagkoffer / tas; Klemmen; Rijghaak; Instructiehandleiding / patroongids; Leeslat; Spoel; Scheerpennen; Garen; Overig
ja: 膝掛け式手織り機用アクセサリー付き: ベルト / 筬; キャリングケース / バッグ; クランプ; 綜絖フック; 取扱説明書 / パターンガイド; ピックアップスティック; シャトル; ワーピングペグ; 糸; その他
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за ръчен стан за тъкане: Колан / гребен-тупалка; Калъф за носене / чанта; Скоби; Кука за нищялки; Ръководство с инструкции / водач за мотиви; Пръчка за мотиви; Совалка; Колчета за основа; Прежда; Друго
zh-TW: 膝上型手織機隨附配件: 皮帶 / 打緯梳; 攜帶盒/手提袋; 夾具; 穿線鉤; 使用手冊/版型指南; 挑線板; 梭子; 整經柱; 紗線; 其他
zh-CN: 内含膝上手织机配件: 皮带/打纬梳; 手提箱/手提袋; 夹具; 穿综钩; 说明书/图样指南; 挑花板; 梭子; 整经木栓; 纱线; 其他
cs: Příslušenství v balení ručního tkalcovského stavu: Pás / tkalcovský hřeben; Přepravní pouzdro / taška; Svorky; Háček na nitěnky; Návod k použití / průvodce vzory; Nabírací lišta; Člunek; Snovací kolíky; Příze; Jiné
sk-SK: Pribalené príslušenstvo k ručnému tkáčskemu stavu: Pás/hrebeň (beater); Puzdro/taška na prenášanie; Svorky; Háčik na niteľnice; Návod na použitie/sprievodca vzormi; Kolík na naberanie; Člnok; Osnovné kolíky; Priadza; Iné
da: Medfølgende tilbehør til lapvæven: Bælte / bankekam; Bæretaske / pose; Klemmer; Trådekrog; Brugermanual / mønsterguide; Mønsterpind; Skytte; Rendepinde; Garn; Andet